Washington statutes.
RCW 5.45.020

Business records as evidence.

A record of an act, condition or event, shall in so far as relevant, be competent evidence if the custodian or other qualified witness testifies to its identity and the mode of its preparation, and if it was made in the regular course of business, at or near the time of the act, condition or event, and if, in the opinion of the court, the sources of information, method and time of preparation were such as to justify its admission.

[ 1947 c 53 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 1263-2. Formerly RCW 5.44.110.]